Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Additions to and Deletions from State System after 1971
§ 65-3-99.
Localities to retain jurisdiction for construction and maintenance purposes over local highways, roads or streets added by legislation to state highway system until brought up to construction standards required by the Transportation Commission and the Department of Transportation.

Whenever, by legislation, any highway, street or road under the jurisdiction of a county, municipality or other political subdivision of the state is placed on the designated state highway system under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission, such highway, street or road shall become a state highway but, unless otherwise specifically provided by law, shall remain under the jurisdiction of the county, municipality or other political subdivision for construction and maintenance purposes until brought up to applicable construction standards as required by the commission and the Department of Transportation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 415, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 19, 2002.).

§§ 65-3-101 through 65-3-131.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 11, eff from and after passage (May 20, 2000).

§65-3-101. [Laws, 1987, ch. 341; Laws, 1987, ch. 344; Laws, 1987, ch. 409, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1987, ch. 508; Laws, 1990, ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 13, 1990)]

§65-3-103. [Laws, 1988, ch. 329; Laws, 1988, ch. 441, §§ 1, 2, 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1988)]

§65-3-105. [Laws, 1989, ch. 324, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 1989)]

§65-3-107. [Laws, 1990, ch. 372, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1990, ch. 431, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1990, ch. 482, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1990, ch. 578, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1990)]

§65-3-109. [Laws, 1991, ch. 549, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991)]

§65-3-111. [Laws, 1991, ch. 493 §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved April 1, 1991)]

§65-3-113. [Laws, 1992, ch. 424 §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1992)]

§65-3-115. [Laws, 1993, ch. 464, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1993)]

§65-3-117. [Laws, 1994, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 464, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 5, 1996)]

§65-3-119. [Laws, 1995, ch. 517, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1995)]

§65-3-121. [Laws, 1996, ch. 497, §§ 3, 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1996)]

§65-3-123. [Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997]

§65-3-125. [Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1997]

§65-3-127. [Laws, 1997, ch. 562, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997]

§65-3-129. [Laws, 1998, ch. 550, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1998)]

§65-3-131. [Laws, 1998, ch. 579, §§ 1-3, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998)]

§ 65-3-133.
Additions to and deletions from State Highway System; Laws, 1999, ch. 531.

SECTION 1.

The mileage of highway specifically designated in subsection (2) of this section is in addition to the total mileage limitation of eight thousand six hundred (8,600) miles that is set out in Section 65-3-3.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and is placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Sections 65-3-3 and 65-3-5, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Southern District – Lawrence and Marion Counties:

An extension of Mississippi 44 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 27 in Lawrence County and extending easterly across the Pearl River to Mississippi 13 in Marion County.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall maintain, construct, take over and assume jurisdiction of the highway designated in subsection (1) of this section in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as set out in Sections 65-1-75, 65-3-3, 65-9-1 and 65-9-3.

SECTION 2.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Wayne County:

Southern District – Wayne County:

Beginning on Mississippi 510 at the end of state maintenance south of Mathersville, thence southeasterly approximately 4.4 miles to Supervisors District 2 of Wayne County.

SECTION 3.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Humphreys County:

Central District – Humphreys County:

Mississippi 435 (Silent Shade Road) beginning at a point on Mississippi 12 approximately 5 miles east of Belzoni, thence northeasterly along the Yazoo River for 9 miles; all in Humphreys County.

SECTION 4.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall perform preliminary engineering, acquire necessary right-of-way and construct or reconstruct and maintain as a four-lane highway the following segment of highway:

Northern District – Lafayette County:

Mississippi 7 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 6 and extending southerly to its intersection with Mississippi 9 West.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 531, §§ 1-4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 1999.).

§ 65-3-135.
Deletion from state highway system; Laws, 2000, ch. 562.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Clay County:

Northern District – Clay County:

Mississippi Highway 389 beginning at the Clay/Oktibbeha County line and extending northerly to Montpelier.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 562, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000.).

§ 65-3-137.
Additions to and deletions from State Highway System; Chapter 574, Laws of 2000, as amended by Chapter 539, Laws of 2012.

SECTION 1.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and is placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance when the City of Flowood provides necessary rights-of-way, including utility adjustments and relocations:

Central District – Rankin County:

Mississippi 468 – That two-lane portion of Mississippi 468 (Flowood Drive) beginning at Fourth Street in Flowood and extending northeasterly to Mississippi Highway 475, a distance of approximately two and two-tenths (2.2) miles.

The segment described in subsection (1) of this section shall be a four-lane facility built to the design standards of the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

SECTION 2.

Central District – Rankin County:

West Rankin Parkway (New Route) – Beginning at Mississippi 25 in the City of Flowood, thence south to U.S. 80 at Pearson Road in the City of Pearl, all in Rankin County.

SECTION 3.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and is placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Southern District – Jones County:

Mississippi 590 – Beginning at Mississippi 11 and extending easterly to Mississippi 29, a distance of approximately 1.3 miles.

SECTION 4.

Central District – Newton County:

Decatur Street beginning on the north side of the intersection of Third Street and Decatur Street, and proceeding northward to the beginning of state maintenance south of U.S. Highway 80, all within the City of Newton.

SECTION 5.

The following highways are deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the governing authorities of the City of Newton:

Central District – Newton County:

That section of old Mississippi 15 beginning south of Interstate 20 at the intersection of old Mississippi 15 and present Mississippi 15 and extending southwesterly for approximately .033 miles, all within the City of Newton; and

That section of old Mississippi 15 located between U.S. Highway 80 and Decatur Street, all within the City of Newton.

SECTION 6.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation may construct to department design standards, may perform such reconstruction as may be required to existing highways and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to provide four (4) lanes for traffic on and along the following location:

Central District – Lauderdale County:

Old U.S. Highway 45 beginning in the City of Meridian at or near the old Coca Cola Company and extending northerly approximately two (2) miles to just beyond the Town of Marion.

Lauderdale County, the City of Meridian and the Town of Marion shall provide required right-of-way, remove all encroachments and bring up to Transportation Department standards existing roads and bridges along the route described in subsection (1) of this section.

The mileage of highway specifically designated in subsection (1) of this section shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance and, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the state designated highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi.

SECTION 7.

The department is authorized to improve the existing Mississippi Highway 25 through Smithville by providing landscaping, appropriate signs and markers, and other enhancements.

It shall be unlawful to construct or erect any advertisement or advertising structure within one thousand (1,000) feet of the right-of-way of the portion of Mississippi Highway 25 described in subsection (1) of this section. This subsection shall not apply to areas located within a municipality or to signs, displays or devices located on a building which carry only advertisements strictly related to the lawful use of the building.

Mississippi Highway 25 shall intersect with U.S. Highway 278 at least five hundred (500) feet west of the eastern city limits of the City of Amory as such city limits existed on January l, 2000.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation is authorized to construct a four-lane connector road at a point at or near the northern city limits of the City of Amory between old Mississippi Highway 25 and the portion of Mississippi Highway 25 described in subsection (1) of this section.

The revisions made to this section in Chapter 539, Laws of 2012, are in response to the destruction and devastation on the Town of Smithville, Mississippi, and Monroe County, Mississippi, caused by the April 2011 tornadoes with the purpose of assisting the town in its recovery efforts.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall number, maintain, take over and assume jurisdiction of the following described highway segment, subject to the conditions prescribed in subsection (2) of this section.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation may construct the highway segment described in subsection (1) of this section as a four-lane facility in accordance with current design standards; however, the City of Flowood, the City of Pearl, Rankin County and any private corporation jointly shall provide necessary engineering and rights-of-way, including utility adjustments and relocations.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and is placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall maintain, construct, take over and assume jurisdiction of the highway designated in subsection (1) of this section in the same manner and upon the same terms and conditions as set out in Sections 65-1-75, 65-9-1 and 65-9-3. However, the City of Newton shall not be required to provide to the Mississippi Department of Transportation any right-of-way with a width any greater than the width of right-of-way that existed at the time that the highway segment described in subsection (1) of this section was returned to the jurisdiction of the City of Newton.

(a) That portion of Mississippi Highway 25 from south of Becker, Mississippi, to the Monroe/Itawamba County line shall be known as the “Monroe County Parkway.”

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching that portion of Mississippi Highway 25 described in this subsection.

The portion of Mississippi Highway 25 described in subsection (1) of this section shall be constructed by the Mississippi Department of Transportation as a fully-controlled access road; provided, however, beginning at a point four (4) miles south of the Monroe/Itawamba county line and extending north to the Monroe/Itawamba county line, the department is not required to construct a fully controlled access road. The Mississippi Department of Transportation is authorized to landscape the right-of-way of the portion of Mississippi Highway 25 described in subsection (1) of this section.

If Mississippi Highway 25 is relocated to the east of Smithville, the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall maintain Mississippi Highway 25 as it existed on January 1, 2011, from a point at least four (4) miles south of the Monroe/Itawamba county line to a point at least two (2) miles north of the Monroe/Itawamba county line through Smithville and may designate it with an appropriate route number.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 574, § 1-7; Laws, 2012, ch. 539, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 65-3-139.
Deletion from State Highway System: Northern District — Tippah County; Laws, 2002, ch. 582.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Tippah County:

Northern District – Tippah County:

Mississippi Highway 368 beginning at the end of state maintenance at its intersection of County Route 700 and extending easterly approximately four and one-half (4.5) miles to its intersection with County Route 701 at or near Buena Vista.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 582, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-140.
Deletion from State Highway System: Central District — Yazoo County — Laws, 2003, ch. 427.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the governing authorities of Yazoo City:

Central District – Yazoo County:

Mississippi 828 – U.S. 49E Spur – Begins on U.S. 49E and extends west to Yazoo City, Yazoo County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2003.).

§ 65-3-140.1.
Deletion from State Highway System: Central District — Copiah County — Laws 2005, ch. 304.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Copiah County:

Central District – Copiah County:

Mississippi Highway 844 beginning on U.S. Highway 51 and proceeding easterly on South Pat Harrison Drive, thence northerly on South Jackson Street, West Georgetown Street and North Jackson Street, thence westerly on North Pat Harrison Drive to U.S. Highway 51, for a total approximate length of 3.57 miles, all within Crystal Springs, Copiah County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 24, 2005.).

§ 65-3-141.
Addition to State Highway System: Northern District — Union County — Laws, 2002, ch. 582.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – Union County:

An extension of Mississippi 30 in the City of New Albany beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 178 and extending east and northerly to its intersection with Sam T. Barkley Road.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 582, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.1.
Add segments in Southern District — Simpson County — to State Highway System.

The following segments of highway are designated as state highways and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highways, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3 and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Southern District – Simpson County:

Mississippi Highway 469 beginning at Harrisville near the old school building, Section 34, Township 2 North, Range 2 East, 7.2 miles north of its intersection with Mississippi Highway 28 at Union, thence .46 miles through Harrisville and ending at the beginning of state maintenance of Mississippi Highway 469 in Section 27, Township 2 North, Range 2 East.

Southern District – Simpson County:

Mississippi Highway 540 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 541 and extending easterly for a distance of 1077.75 feet.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the highway segments described under subsection (1) of this section whenever such highway segments have been brought up to commission standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.2.
Add segments in Northern District — Coahoma County — to State Highway System.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – Coahoma County:

That segment of highway beginning six-tenths (.6) of a mile east of the termination of state maintenance of Mississippi Highway 316 and extending northwesterly to its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. Highway 61, and that segment of highway extending westerly from its intersection with U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. Highway 61 to its intersection with the eastern city limits of Friars Point, Mississippi.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.3.
Add segment in Northern District — DeSoto County — to State Highway System.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – DeSoto County:

That segment of road beginning at the intersection of Mississippi 301 and Mississippi 304 and extending southerly to Arkabutla Dam.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.4.
Add segment in Northern District — Carroll County — to State Highway System.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – Carroll County:

Old Mississippi Highway 430 from the Leflore/Carroll County line southeasterly to its intersection with Mississippi Highway 17, a distance of approximately thirteen (13) miles.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.5.
Add segment in Central District — Kemper County — to State Highway System.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Central District – Kemper County:

That portion of Old Highway 463 from Mississippi Highway 16 northerly to Mississippi Highway 397.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.6.
Add segment in Central District — Bolivar and Sunflower Counties — to State Highway System.

The following highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Central District – Bolivar and Sunflower Counties:

A roadway segment beginning at or near Shelby and extending easterly to at or near Parchman.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.7.
Add segment in Southern District — Jefferson Davis County — to the State Highway System.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Southern District – Jefferson Davis County:

That portion of Mississippi 42 within the corporate limits of the Town of Prentiss beginning at the end of state maintenance on Mississippi 42 at its intersection with an old abandoned railway and proceeding in a northeasterly direction along Columbia Avenue (Mississippi 42) for approximately seven hundred (700) feet to the intersection of Columbia Avenue (Mississippi 42) and Third Street.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.8.
Add segment in Central District — Rankin County — to State Highway System.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Central District – Rankin County:

A three-mile section of Old U.S. 49 beginning at U.S. 80 and extending southerly to new U.S. 49 in the City of Richland.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.9.
Add segment in Northern District — Union County — to State Highway System.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – Union County:

An extension of Mississippi 30 in the City of New Albany beginning at its intersection with Mississippi 178 and extending east and northerly to its intersection with Sam T. Barkley Road.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 618, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 65-3-143.10.
Add segment in Southern District — Marion County — to State Highway System.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall construct to department design standards and may acquire by gift, purchase or eminent domain proceedings such property as may be necessary to perform construction of the following described segment of highway:

Southern District – Marion County:

An extension of Mississippi Highway 48 beginning at or near Sandy Hook and extending in an easterly direction across the Pearl River to an intersection with Mississippi Highway 43 at or near the Spring Cottage Community.

The mileage of highway specifically designated in subsection (1) of this section shall be under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Department of Transportation for construction and maintenance and, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the state designated highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 585, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 65-3-143.11.
Add segment in Northern District — Lowndes County — to State Highway System.

The following segment of roadway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Northern District – Lowndes County:

Airport Road beginning at its intersection with Industrial Park Road and proceeding in a southerly direction until its intersection with Artesia Road.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that such segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on such highway and right-of-way, are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch. 307, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 24, 2005.).

§ 65-3-143.12.
Deletion from State Highway System: Northern District - Itawamba County - Laws, 2007, ch. 577.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Itawamba County:

Northern District – Itawamba County

Mississippi Highway 379 in Itawamba County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 577, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 2007.).

§ 65-3-143.13.
Deletion from State Highway System: Northern District - Tunica County - Laws, 2007, ch. 577.

The following segment of highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the governing authorities of the City of Tunica, Mississippi:

Northern District – Tunica County

Mississippi Highway 4 beginning at the west corporate limits of the City of Tunica, Mississippi, and extending easterly to U.S. Highway 61, for a total approximate length of seven-tenths (.7) miles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 577, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 2007.).

§ 65-3-143.14.
Deletion from State Highway System: Northern District - Marshall County - Laws, 2008, ch. 374.

The following highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Marshall County:

Northern District – Marshall County:

Mississippi Highway 737 beginning on Mississippi 178 at or near Red Banks, thence through the business district of Red Banks and ending on Mississippi 178, all in Marshall County.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2008.).

§ 65-3-143.15.
Deletion from State Highway System: Northern District - Alcorn County - Laws, 2009, ch. 353.

The following segment of highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Board of Supervisors of Alcorn County:

Northern District – Alcorn County:

Mississippi Highway 351 beginning at its intersection with Mississippi Highway 2 and extending southerly to the Alcorn/Tippah County line.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 353, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 65-3-143.16.
Add segment in Northern District - Pontotoc County - to State Highway System.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and that highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the State Highway System of Mississippi:

Northern District – Pontotoc County:

Old Mississippi 6 beginning on the west side of the City of Pontotoc at its intersection with new four-lane Mississippi 6 and extending easterly to its intersection with new Mississippi 6 on the east side of the City of Pontotoc.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described under subsection (1) of this section whenever the commission certifies that the segment of highway has been brought up to commission standards and all utilities, signs, structures and other encroachments on the highway and right-of-way are removed or relocated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 549, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 65-3-143.17.
Deletion from State Highway System: Central District — Madison County — Laws, 2013, ch. 427.

The following segment of highway is deleted from the state highway system, removed from the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and returned to the jurisdiction of the Mayor and Board of Aldermen of the City of Canton, Madison County, Mississippi:

Central District — Madison County:Mississippi 16 beginning at its intersection with U.S. 51 and extending easterly to its intersection with U.S. 43 on the east side of the City of Canton.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 427, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 65-3-143.18.
Add segment in Central District — Madison County — to State Highway System.

The following segment of highway is designated as a state highway and placed under the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Transportation Commission for construction and maintenance; and such highway, together with the highways designated in Section 65-3-3, and all other laws adding links to the designated state highway system, are declared to be the state highway system of Mississippi:

Central District — Madison County:That segment of newly constructed highway extending from U.S. 51 andextending easterly to its intersection with U.S. 43 (MDOT Project NCPD-6993-00(001)/104137-301000), on the east side of the City of Canton, which shall be designated as a part of Mississippi 16.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall take over and assume responsibility for construction and maintenance of the segment of highway described in subsection (1).

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 427, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2013.